Utah statutes.
59-12-1502.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Annexation" means an annexation to a county under Title 17, Chapter 2,
Annexation to County.
(2)  "Annexing area" means an area that is annexed into a county.
(3)  "Local highway of regional significance" means a highway that is:
(a) (i)  a principal arterial highway as defined in Section 72-4-102.5; or
(ii)  a minor arterial highway as defined in Section 72-4-102.5;
(b)  included in a metropolitan planning organization's regional
transportation plan; and
(c)  not a state highway.
(4)  "Metropolitan planning organization" has the same meaning as defined in
Section 72-1-208.5.
(5)  "Qualifying county" means a county in which a sales and use tax
authorized by Section 59-12-502 is not imposed by:
(a)  the county;
(b)  a city within the county; or
(c)  a town within the county.
(6)  "State highway" means a highway designated as a state highway under Title
72, Chapter 4, Designation of State Highways Act.
(7) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (7)(b), "public transit" is as
defined in Section 17B-2a-802.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (7)(a), "public transit" does not include a
fixed guideway system.
